Illinois, session 104th, HB2321.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Oil and Gas Lien Act of 1989 is amended by 5changing Section 1.1 as follows: 6    (770 ILCS 70/1.1)  (from Ch. 82, par. 501.1)7    Sec. 1.1. Short Title. This Act shall be known as the the 8Oil and Gas Lien Act of 1989.9(Source: P.A. 86-377.)